Utah statutes.
32B-6-306.   Master limited-service restaurant license.

(1) (a)  The commission may issue a master limited-service restaurant license that authorizes a person to store, sell, offer for sale, furnish, or allow the consumption of an alcoholic product on premises at multiple locations as limited-service restaurants if the person applying for the master limited-service restaurant license:

(i)  owns each of the limited-service restaurants;

(ii)  except for the fee requirements, establishes to the satisfaction of the commission that each location of a limited-service restaurant under the master limited-service restaurant license separately meets the requirements of this part; and

(iii)  the master limited-service restaurant includes at least five limited-service restaurant locations.

(b)  The person seeking a master limited-service restaurant license shall designate which limited-service restaurant locations the person seeks to have under the master limited-service restaurant license.

(c)  A limited-service restaurant location under a master limited-service restaurant license is considered separately licensed for purposes of this title, except as provided in this section.

(2)  A master limited-service restaurant license and each location under Subsection (1) are considered a single limited-service restaurant license for purposes of Subsection 32B-6-303(3)(a).

(3) (a)  A master limited-service restaurant license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's master limited-service restaurant license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than September 30.

(4) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a master limited-service restaurant license is $330.

(b)  The initial license fee for a master limited-service restaurant license is $5,000 plus a separate initial license fee for each newly licensed limited-service restaurant license under the master limited-service restaurant license determined in accordance with Subsection 32B-6-304(3)(b).

(c)  The renewal fee for a master limited-service restaurant license is $500 plus a separate renewal fee for each limited-service license under the master limited-service restaurant license determined in accordance with Subsection 32B-6-304(3)(c).

(5)  A new location may be added to a master limited-service restaurant license after the master limited-service restaurant license is issued if:

(a)  the master limited-service restaurant licensee pays a nonrefundable application fee of $330; and

(b)  including payment of the initial license fee, the location separately meets the requirements of this part.

(6) (a)  A master limited-service restaurant licensee shall notify the department of a change in the persons managing a location covered by a master limited-service restaurant license:

(i)  immediately, if the management personnel is not management personnel at a location covered by the master limited-service restaurant licensee at the time of the change; or

(ii)  within 30 days of the change, if the master limited-service restaurant licensee is transferring management personnel from one location to another location covered by the master limited-service restaurant licensee.

(b)  A location covered by a master limited-service restaurant license shall keep its own records on its premises so that the department may audit the records.

(c)  A master limited-service restaurant licensee may not transfer alcoholic products between different locations covered by the master limited-service restaurant license.

(7) (a)  If there is a violation of this title at a location covered by a master limited-service restaurant license, the violation may result in disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, against:

(i)  the single location under a master limited-service restaurant license;

(ii)  individual staff of the location under the master limited-service restaurant license; or

(iii)  a combination of persons or locations described in Subsections (7)(a)(i) and (ii).

(b)  In addition to disciplinary action under Subsection (7)(a), disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, may be taken against a master limited-service restaurant licensee or individual staff of the master limited-service restaurant licensee if during a period beginning on November 1 and ending October 31:

(i)  at least 25% of the locations covered by the master limited-service restaurant license have been found by the commission to have committed a serious or grave violation of this title, as defined by rule made by the commission; or

(ii)  at least 50% of the locations covered by the master limited-service restaurant license have been found by the commission to have violated this title.

(8)  The commission may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish how a person may apply for a master limited-service restaurant license under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 349, 2013 General Session

